Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Cooperative Corporations Generally

272.020.
Organization of cooperative corporation — Officers — Votes — Quorum.

Any three (3) or more persons who are residents of this state may organize a cooperative corporation to conduct any agricultural, dairy, mercantile, mining, manufacturing, mechanical, service, or other lawful business, except organizations subject to any of the provisions of the banking laws of this state.

The cooperative corporation shall be organized with shares or with memberships, as provided in articles of incorporation.

The directors of the cooperative corporation shall be elected by the stockholders or members at such times and for such term of office as the bylaws prescribe, and shall hold office until their successors are elected. A majority of the stockholders or members at any regular or special stockholders’ or members’ meeting, legally called, may remove any director or official for cause, and fill the vacancy.

There shall be a president, one (1) or more vice presidents, and a secretary and treasurer, or secretary treasurer, elected annually by and from the directors.

No stockholder or member, regardless of the number of shares he may own, shall have more than one (1) vote upon any proposition.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws of a cooperative corporation may prohibit voting by proxy or voting trusts.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a majority of the stockholders or members entitled to vote, represented in person or by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at a meeting of stockholders or members. In no event shall a quorum consist of less than one-third (1/3) of the stockholders or members entitled to vote, except that the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a cooperative corporation which prohibits both proxies and voting trusts may provide for a lower quorum; but in no event shall the quorum be set lower than one-tenth (1/10) of the stockholders or members entitled to vote or twenty (20) such stockholders or members, whichever is less.

History.

883d-1, 883d-5, 883d-6: amend. Acts 1986, ch. 393, § 2, effective July 15, 1986.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An affirmative declaration may be made in the articles of incorporation to organize as a cooperative corporation under KRS

272.020

to

272.050

, and the applicability of the general business code provisions depends upon whether or not the cooperative corporation is organized with shares or memberships interests.

OAG 00-8

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

General corporation law, application, KRS

271B.3-010

.

Voting rights in private corporation, KRS

271B.7-200

to

271B.7-280

.

272.030.
Reserve fund.

By a vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the stockholders or members, and after the payment of a fixed dividend upon its stock, but before the profits are prorated, any cooperative corporation may create a reserve fund by setting aside each year ten percent (10%) to twenty-five percent (25%) of the remainder of the net profits of its business.

History.

883d-7: amend. Acts 1986, ch. 393, § 3, effective July 15, 1986.

272.040.
Cooperative companies may adopt KRS 272.020 to 272.050 — Filing fee.

Any cooperative company may become subject to the provisions of KRS

272.020

to

272.044

by filing with the Secretary of State a declaration signed and sworn to by the president and secretary that the company, by a majority vote of its stockholders or members, has decided to adopt KRS

272.020

to

272.044

. There shall be paid to the Secretary of State a fee of two dollars ($2) for filing the declaration.

History.

883d-8: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 141, § 14; 1986, ch. 393, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 2010, ch. 151, § 136, effective January 1, 2011.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The payment of the filing fee is a condition precedent for filing documents with the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of State may void the filing and return a document after it has been received, stamped, and filed, if the check for payment of that fee has been dishonored.

OAG 89-94

.

272.042.
KRS provisions applicable to various cooperative corporation organizations.

Unless otherwise provided in KRS 272.010(1) and KRS

272.020

to

272.044

, a cooperative corporation organized with shares shall be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 271B, and a cooperative corporation organized with memberships and operated on a nonprofit basis shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.390

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 393, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 2010, ch. 151, § 137, effective January 1, 2011.

272.044.
Applicability of KRS 272.010(1) and 272.020 to 272.044.

The provisions of KRS 272.010(1) and

272.020

to

272.044

are applicable only to cooperative associations organized under KRS

272.020

to

272.044

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 393, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 2010, ch. 151, § 138, effective January 1, 2011.

272.050.
Limited use of word “cooperative.” [Repealed.]

272.060.
Reversion of unclaimed distributions. [Repealed.]